Virginia statutes. Title 55.1. Property and Conveyances.
Article 3. Management of Condominium.
§ 55.1-1958.
Tort and contract liability; judgment lien.

An action for tort alleging a wrong done (i) by any agent or employee of the declarant or of the unit owners’ association or (ii) in connection with the condition of any portion of the condominium that the declarant or the association has the responsibility to maintain shall be brought against the declarant or the association, as appropriate. No unit owner shall be precluded from bringing such an action by virtue of his ownership of an undivided interest in the common elements or by reason of his membership in the association or his status as an officer.

Unit owners other than the declarant shall not be liable for torts caused by agents or employees of the declarant within any convertible land or using any easement reserved in the declaration or created by §

55.1-1928

or

55.1-1929

.

An action arising from a contract made by or on behalf of the unit owners’ association or its executive board or the unit owners as a group shall be brought against the association, or against the declarant if the cause of action arose during the exercise by the declarant of control reserved pursuant to subsection A of §

55.1-1943

. No unit owner shall be precluded from bringing such an action by reason of his membership in the association or his status as an officer.

A judgment for money against the unit owners’ association shall be a lien against any property owned by the association, and against each of the condominium units in proportion to the liability of each unit owner for common expenses as established pursuant to subsection D of §

55.1-1964

, but not against any other property of any unit owner. A unit owner who pays a percentage of the total amount due under such judgment equal to such unit owner’s liability for common expenses fixed pursuant to subsection D of §

55.1-1964

shall be entitled to a release of any such judgment lien, and the association shall not be entitled to assess the unit for payment of the remaining amount due. Such judgment shall be otherwise subject to the provisions of §

8.01-458

.

History.

1975, c. 415, § 55-79.80:1; 1991, c. 497; 1992, c. 72; 1996, c. 977; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

Law Review.

For article on condominium association liability for failure to provide adequate security or maintenance in the common areas, see 22 U. Rich. L. Rev. 127 (1988).

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Editor’s note. —

The cases cited below were decided under prior law.

Liability for agent’s torts. —

Plaintiff’s negligence claim against a condominium association and its president, alleging she was injured when her dog was attacked by the president’s dogs, survived the association’s demurrer because the complaint was sufficient to support plaintiff’s claim that the president was the association’s agent and that the association might be liable for her actions under the Virginia Condominium Act. McCarthy v. Fennessey, 87 Va. Cir. 143, 2013 Va. Cir. LEXIS 84 (Norfolk Oct. 2, 2013).

Suits against individuals. —

While § 55-79.80:1 precluded bringing actual and constructive fraud actions against an individual defendant, it did not bar plaintiffs’ attempts to hold individual defendants liable by piercing the corporate veil. 313 Freemason v. Freemason Assocs., 59 Va. Cir. 407, 2002 Va. Cir. LEXIS 365 (Norfolk Aug. 30, 2002).

Defendants’ motion to amend in order to file a third-party complaint and a counterclaim was denied, as allowing the amendment would not serve the ends of justice. The counterclaim was barred by res judicata, and allowing individual members of a condominium association to be joined as third-party defendants was improper under § 55-79.80:1, which required that tort and contract actions involving condominiums be brought against the association. Highridge Place Condo. Unit Owner's Ass'n v. Langley, 72 Va. Cir. 21, 2006 Va. Cir. LEXIS 187 (Nelson County Mar. 30, 2006).

On Count IV for fraud in the inducement, fraudulent misrepresentation, and actual fraud, demurrers by the declarant, a limited liability company (LLC), and the co-managers were overruled and demurrers by the real estate company and the realtor were sustained as they were agents for the LLC and any statements they made were meant to induce the purchasers to enter into a contract with the LLC. The real estate company and the realtor did not rise to the level of co-managers of the declarant; therefore, the action was not properly brought against the real estate company and the realtor, pursuant to subsection A of § 55-79.80:1.Millisor v. Anchor Point Ventures, L.L.C., 77 Va. Cir. 246, 2008 Va. Cir. LEXIS 278 (Hopewell Nov. 7, 2008).

Because the complaint by a condominium unit lessee did not allege that individual unit owner was a member of the board of the condominium association, and no allegation suggested that the owner was a member until after the filing of the complaint, the court had to accept the reasonable inference that the owner was acting in the owner’s individual capacity. Because the complaint alleged that the board members acted outside the scope of the members’ membership, the members could not, for purposes of a demurrer, receive the benefit of immunity. Roberts Physical Therapy & Massage v. Trade Ctr. Ass'n, 2020 Va. Cir. LEXIS 968 (Henrico County Nov. 13, 2020).

§ 55.1-1959.
Suspension of services for failure to pay assessments; corrective action; assessment of charges for violations; notice; hearing; adoption and enforcement of rules and regulations.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the executive board shall have the power to establish, adopt, and enforce rules and regulations with respect to use of the common elements and with respect to such other areas of responsibility assigned to the unit owners’ association by the condominium instruments, except where expressly reserved by the condominium instruments to the unit owners. Rules and regulations may be adopted by resolution and shall be reasonably published or distributed to the unit owners. At a special meeting of the unit owners’ association convened in accordance with the provisions of the condominium instruments, a majority of the votes cast at such meeting may repeal or amend any rule or regulation adopted by the executive board. Rules and regulations may be enforced by any method authorized by this chapter.

The unit owners’ association shall have the power, to the extent the condominium instruments or the condominium’s rules and regulations expressly provide, to (i) suspend a unit owner’s right to use facilities or services, including utility services, provided directly through the unit owners’ association for nonpayment of assessments that are more than 60 days past due, to the extent that access to the unit through the common elements is not precluded and provided that such suspension does not endanger the health, safety, or property of any unit owner, tenant, or occupant and (ii) assess charges against any unit owner for any violation of the condominium instruments or of the rules or regulations promulgated pursuant thereto for which such unit owner or his family members, tenants, guests, or other invitees are responsible.

Before any action authorized in this section is taken, the unit owner shall be given a reasonable opportunity to correct the alleged violation after written notice of the alleged violation to the unit owner at the address required for notices of meetings pursuant to §

55.1-1949

. If the violation remains uncorrected, the unit owner shall be given an opportunity to be heard and to be represented by counsel before the executive board or such other tribunal as the condominium instruments or its adopted rules and regulations specify.Notice of such hearing, including the actions that may be taken by the unit owners’ association in accordance with this section, shall, at least 14 days in advance, be hand delivered or mailed by registered or certified United States mail, return receipt requested, to such unit owner at the address required for notices of meetings pursuant to §

55.1-1949

. Within seven days of the hearing, the hearing result shall be hand delivered or mailed by registered or certified mail, return receipt requested, to such unit owner at the address required for notices of meetings pursuant to § 55.1-1949.

The amount of any charges assessed shall not exceed $50 for a single offense, or $10 per diem for any offense of a continuing nature, and shall be treated as an assessment against such unit owner’s condominium unit for the purpose of §

55.1-1966

. However, the total charges for any offense of a continuing nature shall not be assessed for a period exceeding 90 days.

The unit owners’ association may file or defend legal action in general district or circuit court that seeks relief, including injunctive relief, arising from any violation of the condominium instruments or the condominium’s adopted rules and regulations.

After the date an action is filed in the general district or circuit court by (i) the unit owners’ association, by and through its counsel, to collect the charges or obtain injunctive relief and correct the violation or (ii) the unit owner challenging any such charges, no additional charges shall accrue.If the court rules in favor of the unit owners’ association, it shall be entitled to collect such charges from the date the action was filed as well as all other charges assessed pursuant to this section against the unit owner prior to the action. In addition, if the court finds that the violation remains uncorrected, the court may order the unit owner to abate or remedy the violation.In any action filed in general district court pursuant to this section, the court may enter default judgment against the unit owner on the sworn affidavit of the unit owners’ association.

This section shall not be construed to prohibit the grant by the condominium instruments of other powers and responsibilities to the unit owners’ association or its executive board.

History.

1993, c. 667, § 55-79.80:2; 1997, cc. 173, 417; 2000, cc. 846, 906; 2002, c. 509; 2011, cc. 372, 378; 2014, c. 784; 2019, c. 712; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 131.

Cross references.

As to civil jurisdiction of general district courts, see § 16.1-77.

As to appeals from courts not of record in civil cases, see § 16.1-106.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 131, effective July 1, 2021, added subsection A and redesignated the remaining subsections accordingly.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Editor’s note. —

The case cited below was decided under prior law.

Condominium managers did not have the authority to assess fines under this section. —

Condominium managers did not have the authority under either the condominium documents or § 55-79.80:2 to assess fines against a city for (1) failing to properly submit certain paperwork, and (2) purported rules violations by tenants because the assessments were not for the purpose of maintaining, repairing, replacing, or improving common elements of the property. Fairfax County Redevelopment & Hous. Auth. v. Shadowood Condo. Ass'n, 83 Va. Cir. 33, 2011 Va. Cir. LEXIS 78 (Fairfax County May 12, 2011), aff'd, No. 111479, 2012 Va. Unpub. LEXIS 1 (Va. June 22, 2012).

§ 55.1-1960.
Limitation of occupancy of a unit.

To the extent expressly provided in the condominium instruments, the unit owners’ association may limit the number of persons who may occupy a unit as a dwelling. Such limitation shall be reasonable and shall comply with the provisions of applicable law, including the Virginia Fair Housing Law (§

36-96.1

et seq.), the Uniform Statewide Building Code (§

36-97

et seq.), and local ordinances.

History.

1996, c. 888, § 55-79.80:3; 1998, c. 454; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-1960.1.
Limitation of smoking in condominium.

Except to the extent that the condominium instruments provide otherwise, the executive board may establish reasonable rules that restrict smoking in the condominium, including rules that prohibit smoking in the common elements and within units. Rules adopted pursuant to this section may be enforced in accordance with §

55.1-1959

.

History.

2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 131.

Effective date.

This section is effective July 1, 2021, pursuant to Va. Const. Art. IV, § 13.

§ 55.1-1961.
Use of for sale sign in connection with resale.

Except as expressly authorized in this chapter or in the condominium instruments or as otherwise provided by law, no unit owners’ association shall require the use of any for sale sign that is (i) a unit owners’ association sign or (ii) a real estate sign that does not comply with the requirements of the Real Estate Board. A unit owners’ association may, however, prohibit the placement of signs in the common elements and establish reasonable rules and regulations that regulate (a) the number of real estate signs to be located on real property upon which the owner has a separate ownership interest or a right of exclusive possession, so long as at least one real estate sign is permitted; (b) the geographical location of real estate signs on real property in which the owner has a separate ownership interest or a right of exclusive possession, so long as the location of the real estate signs complies with the requirements of the Real Estate Board; (c) the manner in which real estate signs are affixed to real property; and (d) the period of time after settlement when the real estate signs on such real property shall be removed.

History.

1974, c. 416, § 55-79.97; 1975, c. 415; 1978, cc. 234, 290; 1983, c. 60; 1984, cc. 29, 103; 1990, c. 662; 1991, c. 497; 1994, c. 172; 1997, c. 222; 1998, cc. 32, 454, 463; 1999, c. 263; 2001, c. 556; 2002, cc. 459, 509; 2005, c. 415; 2007, cc. 696, 712, 854, 910; 2008, cc. 851, 871; 2011, c. 334; 2013, cc. 357, 492; 2014, c. 216; 2015, c. 277; 2016, c. 471; 2017, cc. 393, 406; 2018, c. 70; 2019, c. 712.

Editor’s note.

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, “Virginia” was deleted preceding “Real Estate Board” to correct an error in the 2019 act.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-1962.
Designation of authorized representative.

Except as expressly authorized in this chapter or in the condominium instruments or as otherwise provided by law, no unit owners’ association shall require any unit owner to execute a formal power of attorney if the unit owner designates a person licensed under the provisions of §

54.1-2106.1

as the unit owner’s authorized representative, and the unit owners’ association shall recognize such representation without a formal power of attorney, provided that the unit owners’ association is given a written authorization that includes the designated representative’s name, contact information, and license number and the unit owner’s signature. Notwithstanding the foregoing, the requirements of §

55.1-1953

and the condominium instruments shall be satisfied before any such representative may exercise a vote on behalf of a unit owner as a proxy.

History.

1974, c. 416, § 55-79.97; 1975, c. 415; 1978, cc. 234, 290; 1983, c. 60; 1984, cc. 29, 103; 1990, c. 662; 1991, c. 497; 1994, c. 172; 1997, c. 222; 1998, cc. 32, 454, 463; 1999, c. 263; 2001, c. 556; 2002, cc. 459, 509; 2005, c. 415; 2007, cc. 696, 712, 854, 910; 2008, cc. 851, 871; 2011, c. 334; 2013, cc. 357, 492; 2014, c. 216; 2015, c. 277; 2016, c. 471; 2017, cc. 393, 406; 2018, c. 70; 2019, c. 712; 2022, cc. 65, 66.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendments by cc. 65 and 66 are identical, and substituted “that includes the designated representative’s name, contact information, and license number and the unit owner’s signature” for “signed by the unit owner designating such representative.”

§ 55.1-1962.1.
Electric vehicle charging stations permitted.

Except to the extent that the condominium instruments provide otherwise, no unit owners’ association shall prohibit any unit owner from installing an electric vehicle charging station for the unit owner’s personal use within the boundaries of a unit or limited common element parking space appurtenant to the unit owned by the unit owner.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter or the condominium instruments, the unit owners’ association may prohibit a unit owner from installing an electric vehicle charging station if installation of the electric vehicle charging station is not technically feasible or reasonably practicable due to safety risks, structural issues, or engineering conditions.

The unit owners’ association may require as a condition of approving installation of an electric vehicle charging station that the unit owner:

Provide detailed plans and drawings for installation of an electric vehicle charging station prepared by a licensed and registered electrical contractor or engineer familiar with the installation and core requirements of an electric vehicle charging station.

Comply with applicable building codes or recognized safety standards.

Comply with reasonable architectural standards adopted by the unit owners’ association that govern the dimensions, placement, or external appearance of the electric vehicle charging station.

Pay the costs of installation, maintenance, operation, and use of the electric vehicle charging station.

Indemnify and hold the unit owners’ association harmless from any claim made by a contractor or supplier pursuant to Title 43.

Pay the cost of removal of the electric vehicle charging station and restoration of the area if the unit owner decides there is no longer a need for the electric vehicle charging station.

Separately meter, at the unit owner’s sole expense, the utilities associated with such electric vehicle charging station and pay the cost of electricity and other associated utilities.

Engage the services of a licensed electrician or engineer familiar with the installation and core requirements of an electric vehicle charging station to install the electric vehicle charging station.

Obtain and maintain insurance covering claims and defenses of claims related to the installation, maintenance, operation, and use of the electric vehicle charging station and provide a certificate of insurance naming the unit owners’ association as an additional insured on the unit owner’s insurance policy for any claim related to the installation, maintenance, operation, or use of the electric vehicle charging station within 14 days after receiving the unit owners’ association’s approval to install such charging station.

Reimburse the unit owners’ association for any increase in common expenses specifically attributable to the electric vehicle charging station installation, including the actual cost of any increased insurance premium amount, within 14 days’ notice from the unit owners’ association.

The conditions imposed pursuant to this section on unit owners for installation of an electric vehicle charging station shall run with title to the unit to which the limited common element parking space is appurtenant.

Any unit owner installing an electric vehicle charging station in a unit or on a limited common element parking space appurtenant to the unit owned by the unit owner shall indemnify and hold the unit owners’ association harmless from all liability, including reasonable attorney fees incurred by the association resulting from a claim, arising out of the installation, maintenance, operation, or use of such electric charging station. A unit owners’ association may require the unit owner to obtain and maintain insurance covering claims and defenses of claims related to the installation, maintenance, operation, or use of the electric vehicle charging station and require the unit owners’ association to be included as a named insured on such policy.

History.

2020, c. 1012.

§ 55.1-1963.
Insurance.

The condominium instruments may require the unit owners’ association, or the executive board or managing agent on behalf of such association, to obtain:

A master casualty policy affording fire and extended coverage in an amount consonant with the full replacement value of the structures within the condominium, or of such structures that in whole or in part comprise portions of the common elements;

A master liability policy, in an amount specified by the condominium instruments, covering the unit owners’ association, the executive board, if any, the managing agent, if any, all persons acting or who may come to act as agents or employees of any of the foregoing with respect to the condominium, and all unit owners and other persons entitled to occupy any unit or other portion of the condominium; and

Such other policies as may be required by the condominium instruments, including workers’ compensation insurance, liability insurance on motor vehicles owned by the unit owners’ association, and specialized policies covering lands or improvements in which the unit owners’ association has or shares ownership or other rights.

Any unit owners’ association collecting assessments for common expenses shall obtain and maintain a blanket fidelity bond or employee dishonesty insurance policy insuring the unit owners’ association against losses resulting from theft or dishonesty committed by the officers, directors, or persons employed by the unit owners’ association, or committed by any common interest community manager or employees of the common interest community manager. Such bond or insurance policy shall provide coverage in an amount equal to the lesser of $1 million or the amount of reserve balances of the unit owners’ association plus one-fourth of the aggregate annual assessment of such unit owners’ association. The minimum coverage amount shall be $10,000. The executive board or common interest community manager may obtain such bond or insurance on behalf of the unit owners’ association.

When any policy of insurance has been obtained by or on behalf of the unit owners’ association, written notice of such obtainment and of any subsequent changes in or termination of the policy shall be promptly furnished to each unit owner by the officer required to send notices of meetings of the unit owners’ association. Such notices shall be sent in accordance with the provisions of subsection A of §

55.1-1949

.

History.

1974, c. 416, § 55-79.81; 2000, c. 906; 2003, c. 360; 2004, c. 281; 2007, cc. 696, 712; 2008, cc. 851, 871; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

Law Review.

For survey article on judicial decisions in real estate law from June 1, 2002 through June 1, 2003, see 38 U. Rich. L. Rev. 223 (2003).

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Editor’s note. —

The cases cited below were decided under prior law.

Unit owner responsible for repairs that exceed the deductible. —

Condominium declaration and by-laws concerning the condominium association obtaining insurance for the benefit of the association and the owners did not alter the statutory requirement under §§ 55-79.79 and 55-79.81 that financial responsibility for maintenance and repair of a damaged condominium unit was placed on the unit owner when deductible under the policy exceeded the expenses of the repairs. Highridge Place Condo. Unit Owner's Ass'n v. Langley, 66 Va. Cir. 185, 2004 Va. Cir. LEXIS 260 (Nelson County Nov. 5, 2004).

Subrogation claim by insurer against tenant of unit. —

Insurer, as subrogee for a condominium association, was not entitled to pursue a subrogation claim against the tenant of a condominium unit for negligent fire damages to the condominium unit allegedly caused by the tenant and a visitor because, the lessee — while held to be bound by all the requirements of an owner under the condominium instruments — also obtained the same benefits as the landlord, the owner, under the condominium instruments, including a subrogation waiver. Erie Ins. Exch. v. Alba, 99 Va. Cir. 35, 2018 Va. Cir. LEXIS 81 (Virginia Beach Jan. 26, 2018).

§ 55.1-1964.
Liability for common expenses; late fees.

Except to the extent that the condominium instruments provide otherwise, any common expenses associated with the maintenance, repair, renovation, restoration, or replacement of any limited common element shall be specially assessed against the condominium unit to which that limited common element was assigned at the time such expenses were made or incurred. If the limited common element involved was assigned at that time to more than one condominium unit, however, such expenses shall be specially assessed against each such condominium unit equally so that the total of such special assessments equals the total of such expenses, except to the extent that the condominium instruments provide otherwise.

To the extent that the condominium instruments expressly so provide, any other common expenses benefiting less than all of the condominium units, or caused by the conduct of less than all those entitled to occupy the same or by their licensees or invitees, shall be specially assessed against any condominium unit involved, in accordance with such reasonable provisions as the condominium instruments may make for such cases. The executive board may impose reasonable user fees.

To the extent that the condominium instruments expressly so provide, (i) any common expenses paid or incurred in making available the same off-site amenities or paid subscription television service to some or all of the unit owners shall be assessed equally against the condominium units involved and (ii) any common expenses paid or incurred in providing metered utility services to some or all of the units shall be assessed against each condominium unit involved based on its actual consumption of such services.

The amount of all common expenses not specially assessed pursuant to subsection A, B, or C shall be assessed against the condominium units in proportion to the number of votes in the unit owners’ association appertaining to each such unit, or, if such votes were allocated as provided in subsection B of §

55.1-1953

, those common expense assessments shall be either in proportion to those votes or in proportion to the units’ respective undivided interests in the common elements, whichever basis the condominium instruments specify. Such assessments shall be made by the unit owners’ association annually, or more often if the condominium instruments so provide. No change in the number of votes in the unit owners’ association appertaining to any condominium unit shall enlarge, diminish, or otherwise affect any liabilities arising from assessments made prior to such change.

Except to the extent otherwise provided in the condominium instruments, if the executive board determines that the assessments levied by the unit owners’ association are insufficient to cover the common expenses of the unit owners’ association, the executive board may levy an additional assessment against all of the units in proportion to their respective undivided interests in the common elements. The executive board shall give written notice to the unit owners stating the amount of, the reasons for, and the due date for payment of any additional assessment. If the additional assessment is to be paid in a lump sum, payment shall be due and payable no earlier than 90 days after delivery or mailing of the notice.All unit owners shall be obligated to pay the additional assessment unless the unit owners by a majority of votes cast, in person or by proxy, at a meeting of the unit owners’ association convened in accordance with the provisions of the condominium instruments within 60 days of the delivery or mailing of the notice required by this subsection, rescind or reduce the additional assessment. No director or officer of the unit owners’ association shall be liable for failure to perform his fiduciary duty if an additional assessment for the funds necessary for the director or officer to perform his fiduciary duty is rescinded by the unit owners’ association in accordance with this subsection. The unit owners’ association shall indemnify such director or officer against any damage resulting from any claimed breach of fiduciary duty due to the assessment for the necessary funds rescinded by the unit owners’ association in accordance with this subsection.

Neither a unit owned by the declarant nor any other unit may be exempted from assessments made pursuant to this section by reason of the identity of the unit owner.

All condominium instruments for condominiums created prior to January 1, 1981, are hereby validated notwithstanding noncompliance with the first sentence of subsection D if they provide instead that the amount of all common expenses not specially assessed pursuant to subsection A, B, or C shall be assessed against the condominium units in proportion to their respective undivided interests in the common elements.

Except to the extent that the condominium instruments or the association’s rules or regulations provide otherwise, an executive board may impose a late fee, not to exceed the penalty provided for in §

58.1-3915

, for any assessment or installment that is not paid within 60 days of the due date for payment of such assessment or installment.

History.

1974, c. 416, § 55-79.83; 1977, c. 428; 1981, c. 180; 1984, cc. 27, 84, 601; 1992, c. 72; 1993, c. 667; 2003, c. 421; 2013, c. 256; 2014, c. 239; 2019, c. 712.

Cross references.

As to lien for work done and materials furnished, see §

43-3

.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

Law Review.

For article on condominium association liability for failure to provide adequate security or maintenance in the common areas, see 22 U. Rich. L. Rev. 127 (1988).

§ 55.1-1965.
Annual budget; reserves for capital components.

Except to the extent provided in the condominium instruments, the executive board shall, prior to the commencement of the fiscal year, make available to unit owners either (i) the annual budget of the unit owners’ association or (ii) a summary of such annual budget.

Except to the extent otherwise provided in the condominium instruments, the executive board shall:

Conduct a study at least once every five years to determine the necessity and amount of reserves required to repair, replace, and restore the capital components as defined in §

55.1-1900

;

Review the results of that study at least annually to determine if reserves are sufficient; and

Make any adjustments the executive board deems necessary to maintain reserves, as appropriate.

To the extent that the reserve study conducted in accordance with this section indicates a need to budget for reserves, the unit owners’ association budget shall include:

The current estimated replacement cost, estimated remaining life, and estimated useful life of the capital components as defined in §

55.1-1900

;

As of the beginning of the fiscal year for which the budget is prepared, the current amount of accumulated cash reserves set aside to repair, replace, or restore the capital components and the amount of the expected contribution to the reserve fund for that fiscal year;

A statement describing the procedures used for estimation and accumulation of cash reserves pursuant to this section; and

A statement of the amount of reserves recommended in the study and the amount of current cash for replacement reserves.

History.

2002, c. 459, § 55-79.83:1; 2019, cc. 33, 44, 712.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2019, cc. 33 and 44 amended § 55-79.83:1 from which this section is derived. Pursuant to § 30-152 and Acts 2019, c. 712, the 2019 amendments have been given effect in this section by
adding subsection A; in subsection B, deleting “and unless the condominium instruments impose more stringent requirements” preceding “the executive board”; in subdivisions B 1 and C 1, inserting “as defined in §

55.1-1900

”; in subdivision C 3, substituting “A statement” for “A general statement” and deleting “and the extent to which the unit owners’ association is funding its reserve obligations consistent with the study currently in effect” at the end; adding subdivision C 4; and making stylistic changes.

To conform to the recodification of Title 55 by Acts 2019, c. 712, effective October 1, 2019, the following substitutions were made at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission: substituted “§

55.1-1900

” for “§ 55-79.41” twice and “executive board” for “executive organ.”

Acts 2019, cc. 33 and 44, cl. 2 provides: “That the Common Interest Community Board shall develop guidelines for the development of reserve studies for capital components, including a list of capital components that should be addressed in a reserve study.”

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.